Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 25

Registration of Farm Names

43-25-101. Names of farms and farm homes may be registered, and be placed on or near public highway.

All owners of farms and farm homes located in this state are authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to adopt suitable names for their farms or farm homes and to register the names with the department of agriculture, as provided in § 43-25-104, each name to be placed in a conspicuous place on or near a public highway.

Acts 1925, ch. 34, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 320a1; Code 1932, § 437; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2501.

Comparative Legislation. Farm names:

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 247.380.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 417.240.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 80-33 et seq.

Collateral References. Agriculture
1, 2.

43-25-102. Registration of a farm or farm home name prevents registration under a like name.

When any owner or owners of any farm or farms or farm home located in any county in this state have complied with this chapter, no other farm or farm home located in that county shall be registered under a like name.

Acts 1925, ch. 34, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 320a2; Code 1932, § 438; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2502.

43-25-103. Application blanks to be furnished.

It is the duty of the commissioner to have printed suitable blanks upon which application for registration shall be made, and to furnish blanks to all persons desiring to comply with this chapter.

Acts 1925, ch. 34, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 320a4; Code 1932, § 440; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2503.

43-25-104. Application for registration of name — Contents — Form.

Any person desiring to register the name of that person's farm or farm home with the department shall make application for registration to the commissioner upon forms to be furnished by the commissioner.

The application shall give the name adopted for the farm or farm home and its post office address and rural route and shall be signed by the person making the application.

Acts 1925, ch. 34, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 320a3; Code 1932, § 439; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2504.

43-25-105. Registration books — Certificate of registration.

The commissioner shall provide a suitable book or books in which to enter the registrations provided for in this chapter; and, upon receipt of such applications for registration, shall cause the registration to be entered in the book or books by counties in compliance with this chapter, and shall issue to the person entitled thereto a certificate of registration.

Acts 1925, ch. 34, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 320a5; Code 1932, § 441; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2505.